North Dakota, session 69, HB1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 32-42-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
32-42-02. Noneconomic damages limited - Reduction of award.
1. With respect to a health care malpractice action or claim, the total amount of
compensation that may be awarded to a claimant or members of the claimant's family
for noneconomic damage resulting from an injury alleged under the action or claim
may not exceed five hundred thousand dollarsone million dollars, regardless of the
number of health care providers and other defendants against whom the action or
claim is brought or the number of actions or claims brought with respect to the injury.
2. With respect to actions heard by a jury, the jury may not be informed of the limitation
contained in this section. If necessary, the court shall reduce the damages awarded by
a jury to comply with the limitation in this section.
Page No. 1 25.0937.02000